Massachusetts, session 194th, H3175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 59 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after clauses
Twenty-second, Twenty-second A, Twenty-second B, Twenty-second C, Twenty-second D,
Twenty-second E, Twenty-second G, Twenty-second H, Twenty-second I, and Twenty-second J
the following:
After the assessors have allowed an exemption pursuant to this clause, no further
evidence of the existence of the facts required by this clause shall be required in any subsequent
year in the city or town in which the exemption has been allowed; provided, however, that the
assessors may refuse to allow an exemption in any subsequent year if they become aware that the
soldier or sailor did not satisfy all of the requisites of this clause at the time the exemption was
first granted.
of 1